cs: Systém kolejnic: KeyMod; M-LOK; Žádný; Picatinny; Proprietární; Ostatní
hu: Rendszerzetsín: KeyMod; M-LOK; Nincs; Picatinny; Saját / védett; Egyéb
pt-BR: Trilho sistema: KeyMod; M-LOK; Nenhum; Picatinny; Exclusivo; Outros
ko: 레일 체계: KeyMod; M-LOK; 없음; 피카티니; 독점; 기타
ro-RO: Sistem de șină: KeyMod; M-LOK; Niciunul; Picatinny; Deținut; Altele
zh-CN: 导轨系统: KeyMod; M-LOK; 无; 皮卡汀尼; 专有; 其他
vi: Hệ thống đường sắt: KeyMod; M-LOK; Không có; Picatinny; Độc quyền; Khác
fi: Kiskojärjestelmä: KeyMod; M-LOK; Ei mitään; Picatinny; Omistusoikeudellinen; Muu
es: Ristema de riel: KeyMod; M-LOK; Ninguno; Picatinny; Patentado; Otro
hr-HR: Sustav željeznica: KeyMod; M-LOK; Nema; Picatinny; Vlasnički; Ostalo
de: Schienensystem: KeyMod; M-LOK; Keine; Picatinny; Proprietär; Sonstige
en: Rail system: KeyMod; M-LOK; None; Picatinny; Proprietary; Other
sl-SI: Sistem tirnic: KeyMod; M-LOK; Brez; Picatinny; Lastniški; Drugo
th: ระบบราง: KeyMod; M-LOK; ไม่มี; Picatinny; กรรมสิทธิ์; อื่นๆ
pl: System kolejowy: KeyMod; M-LOK; Brak; Picatinny; Zastrzeżony; Inne
da: Skinnesystem: KeyMod; M-LOK; Ingen; Picatinny; Navnebeskyttet; Andet
zh-TW: 導軌系統: KeyMod; M-LOK; 無; 皮卡汀尼; 專有; 其他
el: Σύστημα ράγας: KeyMod; M-LOK; Κανένα; Picatinny; Ιδιόκτητο; Άλλο
ja: レールシステム: KeyMod; M-LOK; なし; ピカティニー; 独自の; その他
bg-BG: Железопътна система: KeyMod; M-LOK; Няма; Пикатини; Собствена; Други
tr: Ray sistemi: KeyMod; M-LOK; Yok; Picatinny; Özel; Diğer
nl: Railsysteem: KeyMod; M-LOK; Geen; Picatinny; Eigen; Overig
ru: Система планок: KeyMod; M-LOK; Нет; Пикатинни; Проприетарная; Другое
pt-PT: Sistema de trilhos: KeyMod; M-LOK; Nenhum; Picatinny; Proprietário; Outro
lt-LT: Bėgelio sistema: KeyMod; M-LOK; Nėra; Picatinny; Nuosavybinis; Kita
nb: Skinnesystem: KeyMod; M-LOK; Ingen; Picatinny; Proprietær; Annet
sk-SK: Systém držiaka: KeyMod; M-LOK; Žiadny; Picatinny; Proprietárny; Iné
fr: Système de rail: KeyMod; M-LOK; Aucun; Picatinny; Propriétaire; Autre
sv: Skensystem: KeyMod; M-LOK; Ingen; Picatinny; Tillverkarspecifik; Övrigt
it: Sistema ringhiera: KeyMod; M-LOK; Nessuno; Picatinny; Proprietario; Altro